Washington statutes.
RCW 18.28.185

Violations—Unfair practice under chapter 19.86 RCW.

A violation of this chapter constitutes an unfair or deceptive act or practice in the conduct of trade or commerce under chapter 19.86 RCW.

[ 1979 c 156 s 10.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Severability—1979 c 156: See notes following RCW 18.28.010.